verbo/espanol_verbo_subj_fut_simple.foma
define SubjFutSimpleYo1 [a r ")"] -> {are} || _ 1;
define SubjFutSimpleTu1 [a r ")"] -> {ares} || _ 2;
define SubjFutSimpleElla1 [a r ")"] -> {are} || _ 3;
define SubjFutSimpleNos1 [a r ")"] -> {áremos} || _ 4;
define SubjFutSimpleVos1 [a r ")"] -> {areis} || _ 5;
define SubjFutSimpleUst1 [a r ")"] -> {aren} || _ 6;

define SubjFutSimpleYo2 [e r ")"] -> {iere} || _ 1;
define SubjFutSimpleTu2 [e r ")"] -> {ieres} || _ 2;
define SubjFutSimpleElla2 [e r ")"] -> {iere} || _ 3;
define SubjFutSimpleNos2 [e r ")"] -> {iéremos} || _ 4;
define SubjFutSimpleVos2 [e r ")"] -> {iereis} || _ 5;
define SubjFutSimpleUst2 [e r ")"] -> {ieren} || _ 6;

define SubjFutSimpleYo3 [i r ")"] -> {iere} || _ 1;
define SubjFutSimpleTu3 [i r ")"] -> {ieres} || _ 2;
define SubjFutSimpleElla3 [i r ")"] -> {iere} || _ 3;
define SubjFutSimpleNos3 [i r ")"] -> {iéremos} || _ 4;
define SubjFutSimpleVos3 [i r ")"] -> {iereis} || _ 5;
define SubjFutSimpleUst3 [i r ")"] -> {ieren} || _ 6;

define SubjFutSimple1 SubjFutSimpleYo1 .o. SubjFutSimpleTu1 .o. SubjFutSimpleElla1 .o. SubjFutSimpleNos1 .o. SubjFutSimpleVos1 .o. SubjFutSimpleUst1;
define SubjFutSimple2 SubjFutSimpleYo2 .o. SubjFutSimpleTu2 .o. SubjFutSimpleElla2 .o. SubjFutSimpleNos2 .o. SubjFutSimpleVos2 .o. SubjFutSimpleUst2;
define SubjFutSimple3 SubjFutSimpleYo3 .o. SubjFutSimpleTu3 .o. SubjFutSimpleElla3 .o. SubjFutSimpleNos3 .o. SubjFutSimpleVos3 .o. SubjFutSimpleUst3;

define SubjFutSimple SubjFutSimple1 .o. SubjFutSimple2 .o. SubjFutSimple3;
